src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
ovttamorfemat:ovtta#morfemag AGAdj ;
iešguđetivnnat:ieš#guđet#ivnnag AGAdj ;
sámeivnnat:sámeivnnag AGAdj ;
čuvgesruksesivnnat:čuvges#rukses#ivnnag AGAdj ;
alitivnnat:alit#ivnnag AGAdj ;
ránesivnnat:ránes#ivnnag AGAdj ;
šerresivnnat:šerres#ivnnag AGAdj ;
dáidhámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dáid9#hámag AGAdj ;
goabbatgemállet:goabbatge#málleg AGAdj ;
ovttanamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ovtta#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
viđanamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viđa#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
rivgonamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rivgo#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
oahpesnamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oahpes#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
dakkárnamat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dakkár#namag AGAdj "named A" ;
njealjeivnnat:njealje#ivnnag AGAdj ;
diekkárivnnat:diekkár#ivnnag AGAdj ;
dakkárgeivnnat:dakkárge#ivnnag AGAdj ;
dákkárhámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dákkár#hámag AGAdj ;
guđehámat:guđe#hámag AGAdj ;
oránšaivnnat:oránša#ivnnag AGAdj ;
duokkárhámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duokkár#hámag AGAdj ;
diekkárgehámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diekkárge#hámag AGAdj ;
golmmačiegat:golmma#čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
gávccičiegat:gávcci#čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
3-čiegat:3-čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
8-čiegat:8-čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
sággečiegat:ságge#čiegag AGAdj "cornered A" ;
nákkuvuloš+Use/Sub:nággo#vulož AGAdj ;
badjeljagaš:badjel#jagaž AGAdj ;
badjelmielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:badjel#mielag AGAdj ;
bahámielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahá#mielag AGAdj ;
ráinnasnálat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ráinnas#nálag AGAdj ;
sierramearkkat:sierra#mearkkag AGAdj "marked A" ;
2-uvssat:2-uvssag AGAdj "doored A" ;
5-uvssat:5-uvssag AGAdj "doored A" ;
njealjeuvssat:njealje#uvssag AGAdj "doored A" ;
3-uvssot:3-uvssog AGAdj "doored A" ;
ovttauvssot:ovtta#uvssog AGAdj "doored A" ;
birrajagaš:birra#jagaž AGAdj ;
boaggejuolggat:boagge#juolggag AGAdj ;
dáromállet:dáro#málleg AGAdj ;
dienmállet:dien#málleg AGAdj ;
dieidmállet:dieid9#málleg AGAdj ;
makkármállet:makkár#málleg AGAdj ;
diekkármállet:diekkár#málleg AGAdj ;
boarrásitmállet:boarrásit#málleg AGAdj ;
ođđaseamosmállet:ođđaseamos#málleg AGAdj ;
máŋggačalmmat:máŋgga#čalmmag AGAdj ;
illučalmmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:illu#čalmmag AGAdj ;
buolvvat:buolvvag AGAdj ;
lossagulot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lossa#gulog AGAdj ;
seakkesnađat:seakkes#nađag AGAdj ;
čuvgesnađat:čuvges#nađag AGAdj ;
bárrastávval:bárra#stávval AGAdj ;
dalloš:dallož AGAdj ;
diimmádálvváš:diimmá#dálvváž AGAdj ;
ovttaagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ovtta#agag AGAdj ;
buorreasat:buorre#asag AGAdj ;
njealjelahkat:njealje#lahkag AGAdj "parted A" ;
8-lahtot:8-lahtog AGAdj "membered A" ;
njealjelahtot:njealje#lahtog AGAdj "membered A" ;
moattilanjat:moatti#lanjag AGAdj "roomed A" ;
guhkesleakkat:guhkes#leakkag AGAdj ;
ovccilanjat:ovcci#lanjag AGAdj "roomed A" ;
8-lanjat:8-lanjag AGAdj "roomed A" ;
lossalunddot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lossa#lunddog AGAdj ;
vieresgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vieres#gielag AGAdj ;
dássesiiddot:dásse#siiddog AGAdj ;
guđajuolggat:guđa#juolggag AGAdj ;
sággejuolggat:ságge#juolggag AGAdj ;
7-juolggat:7-juolggag AGAdj ;
erenoamášmearkkat+v2+Dial/%-GG:erenomáš#mearkkag AGAdj "marked A" ;
erenoamáš+Use/Sub:earenoamaž AGAdj ;
fágagielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fága#gielag AGAdj ;
golmmamállet:golmma#málleg AGAdj ;
guktuidmállet:guktuid9#málleg AGAdj ;
boaittubealat:boaittu#bealag AGAdj ;
guđebealat:guđe#bealag AGAdj ;
allaagat:alla#agag AGAdj ;
viđaborat:viđa#borag AGAdj ;
nanudáhtot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nanu#dáhtog AGAdj ;
vuolitdásat:vuolit#dásag AGAdj ;
bastilisgaccat:bastilis#gaccag AGAdj ;
viđagearddat:viđa#gearddag AGAdj ;
ruksesmuđot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rukses#muđog AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
čuvgesmuđot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čuvges#muđog AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
čáđbmemuđot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čáđbme#muđog AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
gáktehámat:gákte#hámag AGAdj ;
gažaldatvuloš:gažaldat#vulož AGAdj ;
golmmačuolmmat:golmma#čuolmmag AGAdj ;
gohpevuđot:gohpe#vu7đog AGAdj ;
máŋggagieškkat:máŋgga#gieškkag AGAdj ;
myrrahájat:myrra#hájag AGAdj ;
systemavuđot:systema#vu7đog AGAdj ;
anárašgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:anáraš#gielag AGAdj ;
gávccijuvllat+Sem/Veh:gávcci#juvllag AGAdj ;
6-juvllat+Sem/Veh+CmpN/First:6-juvllag AGAdj ;
njealjeorddat:njealje#orddag AGAdj "edged A" ;
sámesogat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sáme#sogag AGAdj "familied A" ;
máŋggaoasat:máŋgga#oasag AGAdj ;
guovttebealat:guovtte#bealag AGAdj ;
guovttesiffar:guovtte#siffar AGAdj ;
golmmasuorat:golmma#suorag AGAdj ;
guovttesuorggat:guovtte#suorggag AGAdj ;
guđasiffar:guđa#siffar AGAdj ;
unnitlogugielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:unnit#logu#gielag AGAdj ;
jávohisgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jávohis#gielag AGAdj ;
manjsigielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:manj9si#gielag AGAdj ;
oarjelsámegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oarjel#sáme#gielag AGAdj ;
máttasámegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mátta#sáme#gielag AGAdj ;
goltágielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goltá#gielag AGAdj ;
uŋgáragielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:uŋgára#gielag AGAdj ;
viđašlájat:viđa#šlájag AGAdj ;
goabbatšlájat:goabbat#šlájag AGAdj ;
buorrešlájat:buorre#šlájag AGAdj ;
diekkáršlájat:diekkár#šlájag AGAdj ;
juoppágoappágielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:juoppá#goappá#gielag AGAdj ;
majoritehtagielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:majoritehta#gielag AGAdj ;
viđagielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viđa#gielag AGAdj ;
mangegielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mange#gielag AGAdj ;
goappašiidgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goappašiid9#gielag AGAdj ;
fránskkagielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fránskka#gielag AGAdj ;
jearaldatvuloš:jearaldat#vulož AGAdj ;
molssaevttot:molssa#e7vttog AGAdj ;
guovttemielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guovtte#mielag AGAdj ;
vuostemielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuoste#mielag AGAdj ;
mumielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mu#mielag AGAdj ;
sinmielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sin#mielag AGAdj ;
máŋggafearggat:máŋgga#fearggag AGAdj ;
ovttakultuvrrat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ovtta#kultuvrrag AGAdj ;
namat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:namag AGAdj "named A" ;
njuolggolunddot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njuolggo#lu7nddog AGAdj ;
olgogollát+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:olgo7#gollág AGAdj ;
boađusguvllot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:boađus#guvllog AGAdj ;
vuogádatguvllot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuogádat#guvllog AGAdj ;
márkanguvllot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:márkan#guvllog AGAdj ;
ovttaháváš:ovtta#háváž AGAdj ;
mansorttat:man#sorttag AGAdj ;
muhtunsorttat:muhtun#sorttag AGAdj ;
earásorttat:eará#sorttag AGAdj ;
diensorttat:dien#sorttag AGAdj ;
árggessorttat:árgges#sorttag AGAdj ;
guhkesruojat:guhkes#ruojag AGAdj ;
ráigeoaivvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ráige#oaivvag AGAdj ;
stábat:stábag AGAdj ; !						   !
sudnohámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sudno#hámag AGAdj ;
donivnnat:don#ivnnag AGAdj ;
minhámat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:min#hámag AGAdj ;
gáktehámat:gákte#hámag AGAdj ;
máinnashámat:máinnas#hámag AGAdj ;
imašlašhámat:imašlaš#hámag AGAdj ;
eaŋgalasgielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eaŋgalas#gielag AGAdj ;
dánskkagielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dánskka#gielag AGAdj ;
dološdárogielat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dološ#dáro#gielag AGAdj ;
uminddet+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:u#minddeg AGAdj ;
ruksesáissat:rukses#ájssag AGAdj ;
guovtteávjjot:guovtte#ávjjog AGAdj "edged A" ;
diehtováillat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diehto#váillag AGAdj ;
áidnalunddot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:áidna#lu7nddog AGAdj ;
dákkárlunddot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dákkár#lu7nddog AGAdj ;
duokkársorttat:duokkár#sorttag AGAdj ;
áigeguovdil+A+Comp+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččabu HEAPMIOBL ;
čađačalmmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čađa#čalmmag AGAdj ;
sevdnjesvuovttat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sevdnjes#vuovttag AGAdj ;
galbmavarat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:galbma#varag AGAdj ;
ruškesvarat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruškes#varag AGAdj ;
čáhppesčalmmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čáhppes#čalmmag AGAdj ;
ovttajienat:ovtta#jienag AGAdj ;
stuorašattot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuora#šattog AGAdj "by growth A" ;
dokkársoarttat:dokkár#soarttag AGAdj ;
soamessoarttat:soames#soarttag AGAdj ;
uhcasoarttat:uhca#soarttag AGAdj ;
máŋggasoarttat:máŋgga#soarttag AGAdj ;
donsoarttat:don#soarttag AGAdj ;
roaŋkečuvddat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roaŋke#čuvddag AGAdj "fingered A" ;
jiešguđetivnnat:jieš#guđet#ivnnag AGAdj ;
jiešguđetšlájat:jieš#guđet#šlájag AGAdj ;
jiešguhtetsorttat:jieš#guhtet#sorttag AGAdj ;
